California statutes. Fish and Game Code
(a) (1) The secretary, in consultation and coordination with the authority, shall lead the Salton Sea restoration efforts that shall include all of the following:

(A) Early start habitat demonstration projects.

(B) Biological investigations relating to the restoration of the Salton Sea.

(C) Investigations of water quality, sedimentation, and inflows relating to the restoration of the Salton Sea.

(D) Air quality investigations, in consultation and coordination with local and regional air quality agencies,
 relating to the restoration of the Salton Sea.

(E) Geotechnical investigations relating to the restoration of the Salton Sea.

(F) Financial assistance grant programs to support restoration activities of local stakeholders.

(2) Nothing in this article shall alter any state responsibility under the Quantification Settlement Agreement or the state’s authority to carry out any responsibility under the Quantification Settlement Agreement.

(3) (A) To the extent that funding is appropriated to the department for Salton Sea restoration activities, the Department of Water Resources, in coordination and under agreement with the department, may undertake restoration efforts identified in this subdivision.

(B) The department and the Department of Water Resources shall do all of the following for the Salton Sea Species Conservation Habitat Project:

(i) Immediately make available relevant information relating to the factors that influence the cost and size of the alternatives discussed in the environmental impact report or environmental impact statement for the species habitat conservation program.

(ii) Release all available detail on a final project design immediately, or upon final determination of a least environmentally damaging preferred alternative by the United States Army Corps of Engineers. Details of a final project design shall include location, configuration, size, and cost.

(iii) Immediately make available project evaluation protocols that include
 the following principles of adaptive management:

(I) Goals and objectives of the project.

(II) The project design and an operations plan.

(III) A monitoring plan that will include metrics that identify benefits to the species.

(IV) A performance evaluation based on species population identified through monitoring.

(V) A decisionmaking framework to evaluate project performance and guide operations and management changes.

(b) (1) The authority may lead a feasibility study, in coordination and under contract with the secretary, to do the following:

(A) Investigate access and utility agreements that may contribute to the future funding of restoration activities at the Salton Sea.

(B) Analyze all feasible funding sources for restoration program components and activities.

(C) Analyze economic development opportunities, including, but not limited to, renewable energy, biofuels, mineral development, and algae production for the purposes of identifying new revenue sources for the Salton Sea restoration efforts.

(D) Identify state procurement and royalty sharing opportunities.

(E) Review existing long-term plans for restoration of the Salton Sea and recommend to the secretary changes to existing restoration plans. In any review pursuant to this subparagraph, the authority shall consider the
 impacts of the restoration plan on air quality, fish and wildlife habitat, water quality, and the technical and financial feasibility of the restoration plan and shall consider the impacts on other agencies responsible for air quality, endangered species, and other environmental mitigation requirements for implementation of the Quantification Settlement Agreement.

(2) No evaluation, study, review, or other activity pursuant to this article shall delay the planning and implementation of ongoing and planned restoration or mitigation projects, including, but not limited to, the Salton Sea Species Conservation Habitat Project or other measures pursuant to existing state and federal programs and agreements.

(c) Notwithstanding any other law, the Department of Water Resources is authorized to use design-build procurement authority for projects constructed at the Salton Sea in accordance
 with Article 6 (commencing with Section 10187) of Chapter 1 of Part 2 of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 340, Sec. 7.   (SB 839)   Effective September 13, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

2943.

For the purposes of considering local, publicly derived input concerning habitat objectives and actions, types and levels of public access, and integration of air quality management and habitat restoration, the secretary shall seek input from the authority with regard to the following components of restoration of the Salton Sea:

(a) Design opportunities and constraints, including the integration of the habitat, public access, and air quality management objectives.

(b) Public access and recreational components.

(c) Opportunities for economic development.

(d) Habitat mosaics and location.

(e) Vector management and predator control.

(f) Feasible financial resources to fund all recommended restoration program components.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 402, Sec. 1.   (AB 71)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

2945.

(a) Nothing in this article interferes with or prevents the exercise of authority by a public agency to carry out its programs, projects, or responsibilities.

(b) Nothing in this article affects requirements imposed under any other provision of law.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 402, Sec. 1.   (AB 71)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Lithium [2950. - 2954.]

2950.

For purposes of this article, the following definitions apply:

(a) “Agency” means the Natural Resources Agency.

(b) “Disadvantaged community” has the same meaning as defined in Section 80002 of the Public Resources Code.

(c) “Nonprofit corporation” means a nonprofit corporation qualified to do business in California and exempt from taxation under Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code.

(d) “Salton Sea Management Plan” means the Salton Sea Management Program Phase I: 10-Year Plan published in August
 2018, or revised thereafter.

(e) “Secretary” means the Secretary of the Natural Resources Agency.

(f) “Severely disadvantaged community” has the same meaning as defined in Section 80002 of the Public Resources Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 251, Sec. 2.   (AB 209)   Effective September 6, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

2951.

(a) There is hereby created the Salton Sea Lithium Fund within the State Treasury to be administered by the Natural Resources Agency.

(b) Pursuant to Section 47100 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, moneys generated by the lithium extraction
 excise tax imposed pursuant to Section 47010 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, and any other moneys as directed by the Legislature, are deposited into the Salton Sea Lithium Fund.

(c) Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, the Salton Sea Lithium Fund is hereby continuously appropriated without regard to
 fiscal years to the agency for purposes of this article.

(d) The agency shall allocate the moneys in the Salton Sea Lithium Fund for the following purposes, except as specified in subdivision (f):

(1) Operations and maintenance of restoration projects, or other public works projects, that are in existence on January 1, 2023, or are developed by the state pursuant to the Salton Sea Management Plan or an applicable State Water Resources Control Board order, including Orders WRO 2002-0013 and WR 2017-0134 and orders issued on or after January 1, 2023.

(2) Restoration projects required to meet the state’s obligations as identified in any state plan or order related to the management of the Salton Sea, including the Salton Sea Management Plan or an applicable State Water Resources Control Board order, including Orders WRO 2002-0013 and WR 2017-0134 and orders issued on or after January 1, 2023.

(3) Grants for community engagement, public amenity, capital improvement, or community-benefit projects, including projects to help build capacity for meaningful public participation and outreach, at or around the Salton Sea and those communities impacted by the Salton Sea’s restoration and development, as found by the secretary to be necessary and consistent with the state management objectives in the Salton Sea Management Plan. Entities eligible for these grants include, but are not limited to, tribal governments, nonprofit corporations,
 and local governments that serve disadvantaged communities or severely disadvantaged communities, as found by the secretary to be necessary and consistent with the state management objectives in the Salton Sea Management Plan.

(e) When awarding a grant pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (d) to a nonprofit corporation, the agency shall give preference to a nonprofit corporation that meets all of the following criteria:

(1) The nonprofit corporation is in good standing by having complied with all state and federal requirements applicable to nonprofit corporations and having not been subject to any form of sanction, suspension, or disciplinary censure.

(2) The nonprofit corporation has a demonstrated presence in the Salton Sea region and experience working across different sectors, including, but not limited to,
 community stakeholders, local and state agencies, academia, independent contractors, and researchers, and the nonprofit corporation’s staff implementing the grant will be located in or near disadvantaged communities located near the Salton Sea.

(3) The nonprofit corporation possesses experience relating to environmental justice initiatives, health intervention programs, direct assistance services, and civic education and engagement with community stakeholders across disadvantaged communities in the Salton Sea region.

(f) Notwithstanding subdivision (d), the agency shall not allocate moneys pursuant to this article for purposes of funding an otherwise legally required mitigation project by a third party under any other existing agreement.

(g) (1) When allocating moneys pursuant to this article,
 the agency shall prioritize allocations immediately necessary for operations and maintenance, but may allocate those moneys for any of the purposes described in subdivision (d) based on expected revenue.

(2) Each fiscal year, the agency shall allocate a portion of the revenues deposited into the Salton Sea Lithium
 Fund for the purposes described in paragraph (3) of subdivision (d).

(3) The agency may maintain a prudent reserve in the Salton Sea Lithium Fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 251, Sec. 3.   (AB 209)   Effective September 6, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

2952.

(a) Before allocating moneys pursuant to this article, the agency shall develop and adopt project solicitation and evaluation guidelines.

(b) The guidelines may include monitoring and reporting requirements, a limit on the dollar amount of grant awards, and other requirements, including eligibility requirements.

(c) The guidelines shall encourage, where feasible, inclusion of the following project components:

(1) Efficient use of water supplies and other natural resources.

(2) Protection and preservation of habitat.

(3) Mitigation of dust or other human health hazards.

(4) Protection of tribal cultural resources.

(5) Operation and maintenance of built infrastructure.

(6) Access and inclusion of underserved or underrepresented communities in public processes.

(d) Before adopting the guidelines, the agency shall consult with tribes and hold two public meetings to consider tribal input and public comments.

(e) Before holding a public meeting related to the guidelines, the agency shall publish a draft of the guidelines on its internet website.

(f) All public meetings related to
 the guidelines shall be conducted in the vicinity of the Salton Sea.

(g) The secretary shall cause to be posted, in an electronic form, the adopted guidelines on the agency’s internet website.

(h) Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code does not apply to the development and adoption of the guidelines.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 63, Sec. 1.   (SB 125)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

2953.

For purposes of implementing this article, the agency may enter into agreements with other agencies, including the Department of Water Resources.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 63, Sec. 1.   (SB 125)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

2954.

On or before June 30 of each fiscal year, the agency shall report on its internet website the projected operating and maintenance costs of state-developed or -managed public works or restoration projects at the Salton Sea for the following fiscal year that will be funded through the Salton Sea Lithium Fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 251, Sec. 4.   (AB 209)   Effective September 6, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 4. BIRDS AND MAMMALS [3000. - 4903.]



PART 1. PROVISIONS GENERALLY APPLICABLE TO BOTH [3000. - 3480.]



  CHAPTER 1. General Provisions [3000. - 3087.]



  ARTICLE 1. Methods of Taking [3000. - 3012.]

3000.

It is unlawful to take any bird or mammal, except a nongame mammal, between one-half hour after sunset and one-half hour before sunrise of the following day at the place of taking, except as otherwise provided in this code or under such regulations as the commission may adopt. The commission may adopt regulations prohibiting the taking of any nongame mammal between one-half hour after sunset and one-half hour before sunrise of the following day at the place of taking.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1470.)
-------------------------------------------

3001.

It is unlawful to take birds or mammals with firearms, BB devices as defined in Section 16250 of the Penal Code, crossbows, or with bow and arrow when intoxicated.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 178, Sec. 29.   (SB 1115)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 107 of Ch. 178.)
-------------------------------------------

3002.

It is unlawful to shoot at any game bird or mammal, including a marine mammal as defined in Section 4500, from a powerboat, sailboat, motor vehicle, or airplane.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 786.)
-------------------------------------------

3003.

(a) It is unlawful for a person to shoot, shoot at, or kill a bird or mammal with a gun or other device accessed via an Internet connection in this state.

(b) It is unlawful for a person, firm, corporation, partnership, limited liability company, association, or other business entity to do either of the following:

(1) Own or operate a shooting range, site, or gallery located in the state for the purpose of online shooting or spearing of a bird or mammal.

(2) Create, maintain, or utilize an Internet Web site, or other service or business in this state, for
 the purpose of online shooting or spearing of a bird or mammal.

(c) It is unlawful to possess or confine a bird or mammal in furtherance of an activity prohibited by this section.

(d) It is unlawful for a person in this state to import into, or export from, this state a bird or mammal that is killed by a device accessed via an Internet connection.

(e) A bird or mammal that is possessed in violation of this section shall be subject to seizure by the department.

(f) For the purposes of this section, “online shooting or spearing” means the use of a computer or other device, equipment, software, or technology to remotely control the aiming and discharge of a weapon, including, but not limited to, a firearm, bow and arrow, spear, slingshot, harpoon, or other
 projectile device.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 154, Sec. 59.   (AB 1527)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

3003.1.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 1001, 1002, 4002, 4004, 4007, 4008, 4009.5, 4152, 4180, or 4181:

(1) It is unlawful for any person to trap for the purposes of recreation or commerce in fur any fur-bearing mammal or nongame mammal with any body-gripping trap. A body-gripping trap is one that grips the mammal’s body or body part, including, but not limited to, steel-jawed leghold traps, padded-jaw leghold traps, conibear traps, and snares. Cage and box traps, nets, suitcase-type live beaver traps, and common rat and mouse traps shall not be considered body-gripping traps.

(2) It is unlawful for any person to
 buy, sell, barter, or otherwise exchange for profit, or to offer to buy, sell, barter, or otherwise exchange for profit, the raw fur, as defined by Section 4005, of any fur-bearing mammal or nongame mammal that was trapped in this state, with a body-gripping trap as described in paragraph (1).

(3) It is unlawful for any person, including an employee of the federal, state, county, or municipal government, to use or authorize the use of any steel-jawed leghold trap, padded or otherwise, to capture any game mammal, exotic game mammal, fur-bearing mammal, nongame mammal, or protected mammal, or any dog or cat. The prohibition in this subdivision does not apply to federal, state, county, or municipal government employees or their duly authorized agents in the extraordinary case where the otherwise prohibited padded-jaw leghold trap
 is the only method available to protect human health or safety.

(4) For purposes of this section, fur-bearing mammals, game mammals, nongame mammals, and protected mammals are those mammals so defined by statute on January 1, 1997, except as regards exotic game mammals.

(b) Nothing in this section authorizes any person to trap for purposes of recreation or commerce in fur any fur-bearing mammal or nongame mammal by any other means. 

(c) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2024.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 1) and added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 469, Sec. 2.   (SB 856)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Operative July 1, 2024, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

3003.2.

Notwithstanding Sections 4003, 4152, 4180, or 4180.1 of this code or Section 14063 of the Food and Agricultural Code, no person, including an employee of the federal, state, county, or municipal government, may poison or attempt to poison any animal by using sodium fluoroacetate, also known as Compound 1080, or sodium cyanide.

(History: Added November 3, 1998, by initiative Proposition 4, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

3003.5.

It is unlawful to pursue, drive, or herd any bird or mammal with any motorized water, land, or air vehicle, including, but not limited to, a motor vehicle, airplane, powerboat, or snowmobile, except in any of the following circumstances:

(a) On private property by the landowner or tenant thereof to haze birds or mammals for the purpose of preventing damage by that wildlife to private property.

(b) Pursuant to a permit from the department issued under regulations as the commission may prescribe.

(c) In the pursuit of agriculture.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 285, Sec. 49.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

3004.

(a) It is unlawful for a person, other than the owner, person in possession of the premises, or a person having the express permission of the owner or person in possession of the premises, while within 150 yards of an occupied dwelling house, residence, or other building, or within 150 yards of a barn or other outbuilding used in connection with an occupied dwelling house, residence, or other building, to either hunt or discharge a firearm or other deadly weapon while hunting. The 150-yard area is a “safety zone.”

(b) It is unlawful for a person to intentionally discharge a firearm or release an arrow or crossbow bolt over or across a public road or other established way open to the public in an unsafe and reckless
 manner.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 154, Sec. 60.   (AB 1527)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

3004.5.

(a) (1) Nonlead centerfire rifle and pistol ammunition, as determined by the commission, shall be required when taking big game, as defined in the department’s mammal hunting regulations (Section 350 of Title 14 of the California Code of Regulations), with rifle or pistol, and when taking coyote, within the California condor range.

(2) For purposes of this section, “California condor range” means:

(A) The department’s deer hunting zone A South, but excluding Santa Cruz, Alameda, Contra Costa, San Mateo, and San Joaquin Counties, areas west of Highway 101 within Santa Clara County, and areas between Highway 5 and Highway 99 within Stanislaus, Merced, Madera, Fresno, Kings, Tulare,
 and Kern Counties.

(B) Areas within deer hunting zones D7, D8, D9, D10, D11, and D13.

(3) The requirements of this subdivision shall remain in effect in the California condor range unless and until the more restrictive nonlead prohibitions required pursuant to subdivision (b) are implemented.

(b) Except as provided in subdivision (i), and as soon as is practicable as implemented by the commission pursuant to subdivision (h), but by no later than July 1, 2019, nonlead ammunition, as determined by the commission, shall be required when taking all wildlife, including game mammals, exotic game mammals, game birds, nongame birds, and nongame mammals, with any firearm.

(c) (1) The commission shall maintain, by regulation, a public
 process to certify ammunition as nonlead ammunition, and shall define, by regulation, nonlead ammunition as including only ammunition in which there is no lead content, excluding the presence of trace amounts of lead. The commission shall establish and annually update a list of certified ammunition.

(2) The list of certified ammunition shall include, but not be limited to, any federally approved nontoxic shotgun ammunition.

(d) (1) To the extent that funding is available, the commission shall establish a process that will provide hunters with nonlead ammunition at no or reduced charge. The process shall provide that the offer for nonlead ammunition at no or reduced charge may be redeemed through a coupon sent to a permitholder with the appropriate permit tag. If available funding is not sufficient to provide nonlead ammunition at no charge, the commission
 shall set the value of the reduced charge coupon at the maximum value possible through available funding, up to the average cost within this state for nonlead ammunition, as determined by the commission.

(2) The nonlead ammunition coupon program described in paragraph (1) shall be implemented only to the extent that sufficient funding, as determined by the Department of Finance, is obtained from local, federal, public, or other nonstate sources in order to implement the program.

(e) The department shall notify those hunters who may be affected by this section.

(f) A person who violates any provision of this section is guilty of an infraction punishable by a fine of five hundred dollars ($500). A second or subsequent offense shall be punishable by a fine of not less than one thousand dollars ($1,000) or more than five
 thousand dollars ($5,000).

(g) This section does not apply to government officials or their agents when carrying out a statutory duty required by law.

(h) The commission shall promulgate regulations by July 1, 2015, that phase in the requirements of this section. The requirements of this section shall be fully implemented statewide by no later than July 1, 2019. If any of the requirements of this section can be implemented practicably, in whole or in part, in advance of July 1, 2019, the commission shall implement those requirements. The commission shall not reduce or eliminate any existing regulatory restrictions on the use of lead ammunition in the California condor range unless or until the additional requirements for use of nonlead ammunition as required by this section are implemented.

(i) (1) The prohibition in subdivision (b) shall be temporarily suspended for a specific hunting season and caliber upon a finding by the director that nonlead ammunition of a specific caliber is not commercially available from any manufacturer because of federal prohibitions relating to armor-piercing ammunition pursuant to Chapter 44 (commencing with Section 921) of Title 18 of the United States Code.

(2) Notwithstanding a suspension pursuant to paragraph (1), nonlead ammunition shall be used when taking big game mammals, exotic game mammals, nongame birds, or nongame mammals in the California condor range.

(j) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2024.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 469, Sec. 4) by Stats. 2023, Ch. 132, Sec. 62.   (AB 1760)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Operative July 1, 2024, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

3005.

(a) It is unlawful to take birds or mammals with any net, pound, cage, trap, set line or wire, or poisonous substance, or to possess birds or mammals so taken, whether taken within or without this state, except as provided in this code or, when relating to ongoing mining operations, in accordance with a mitigation plan approved by the department.

(b) (1) Mitigation plans relating to mining operations approved by the department shall, among other criteria, require avoidance of take, where feasible, and include reasonable and practicable methods of mitigating the unavoidable take of birds and mammals. When approving mitigation plans, the department shall consider the use of the best available technology on a site-specific basis.

(2) Mitigation plans relating to mining operations approved by the department shall include provisions that address circumstances where mining operations contribute to bird deaths, including ponding of process solutions on heap leach pads and exposure of process solution channels, solution ponds, and tailing ponds.

(3) The mine operator shall prepare a mitigation plan that shall be submitted to the department for approval. For ongoing mining operations, the mitigation plan shall result in an overall reduction in take of avian or mammal species. The department shall provide an opportunity for public review and comment on each mitigation plan during the department’s approval process. The mitigation plan shall be prepared on a site-specific basis and may provide for offsite mitigation measures designed to reduce avian mortality. The mine operator shall submit monthly monitoring reports on avian mortality to the department to aid in evaluating the effectiveness of onsite mitigation measures.

(4) The department shall monitor and evaluate implementation of the mitigation plan by the mine operator and require modification of the plan or other remedial actions to be taken if the overall reduction in take of avian or mammal species required pursuant to paragraph (3) is not being achieved.

(5) The mining operator shall reimburse the department for its direct costs to provide appropriate notice of the mitigation plan to affected local government entities and other affected parties. The mine operator shall provide the department a limited number of copies, as determined by the department, of the mitigation plan for public review.

(c) Proof of possession of any bird or mammal that does not show evidence of having been taken by means other than a net, pound, cage, trap, set line or wire, or poisonous substance, is prima facie evidence that the birds or mammals were taken in violation of this section.

(d) This section does not apply to the lawful taking of fur-bearing mammals, nongame birds, nongame mammals, or mammals found to be injuring crops or property, to the taking of birds or mammals under depredation permits, to taking by employees of the department acting in an official capacity, or to taking in accordance with the conditions of a scientific or propagation permit by the holder of that permit.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 768, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

3005.5.

(a) It is unlawful to capture any game mammal, exotic game mammal, game bird, nongame bird, nongame mammal, or furbearer, or to possess or confine any live game mammal, exotic game mammal, game bird, nongame bird, nongame mammal, or furbearer taken from the wild, except as provided by this code or regulations made pursuant to this code. Any bird or mammal possessed or confined in violation of this section shall be seized by the department.

(b) The commission may promulgate regulations permitting the temporary confinement of game mammals, exotic game mammals, game birds, nongame birds, nongame mammals, or furbearers for the purpose of
 treating the animals, if injured or diseased.

(c) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2024.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 5) and added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 469, Sec. 6.   (SB 856)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Operative July 1, 2024, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

3006.

Except as authorized under a domesticated game breeder’s license, a deer, elk, or bear kept in captivity may be killed only with the approval of the department, and pursuant to any regulation that the commission may adopt. The carcass of a deer, elk, or bear kept in captivity may not be sold, and shall be disposed of as directed by the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 154, Sec. 61.   (AB 1527)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

3007.

Except as provided in this code or regulations adopted pursuant to this code, it is unlawful to take a bird or mammal without a license or entitlement to do so.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 154, Sec. 62.   (AB 1527)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

3008.

The physical control of a dog by its owner while the dog is engaged in hunting in an area where the owner is otherwise authorized to hunt, shall be as required by this code or regulations made pursuant thereto.

Dogs which are used for hunting which have been vaccinated for rabies in their county of residence in conformity with state law regulating vaccinations in rabies areas are not subject to rabies vaccination requirements of local ordinances outside their county of residence.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 444.)
-------------------------------------------

3009.

Every person who while taking any bird or mammal kills or injures another person by the use of any firearm, bow and arrow, spear, slingshot, or other weapon or device used in such taking and who knowingly either abandons such person or fails to render to such injured person all necessary aid possible under the circumstances is guilty of a felony.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 1815.)
-------------------------------------------

3010.

It is unlawful for any person to take any pheasant within 300 yards of any vehicle from which pheasants are being released into an area for hunting while such pheasants are being released.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 1674.)
-------------------------------------------

3011.

No person, including employees of the state, federal or county government, shall take bear with iron or steel-jawed or any type of metal-jawed traps, and no provision of this code or any other law shall be construed to authorize, or to permit the authorizing of, the use of iron or steel-jawed or any type of metal-jawed traps to take bear.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 310.)
-------------------------------------------

3012.

It is unlawful to use any recorded or electrically amplified bird or mammal calls or sounds, or recorded or electrically amplified imitations of bird or mammal calls or sounds, to assist in taking any bird or mammal, except nongame birds and nongame mammals as permitted by regulations of the commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1114.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Hunting Licenses [3031. - 3040.]

3031.

(a) A hunting license, granting the privilege to take birds and mammals, shall be issued to any of the following:

(1) A resident of this state, 16 years of age or older, upon the payment of a base fee of thirty-one dollars and twenty-five cents ($31.25).

(2) A resident or nonresident, who is under 16 years of age on July 1 of the licensing year, upon the payment of a base fee of eight dollars and twenty-five cents ($8.25), regardless of whether that person applies before or after July 1 of that year. A license issued pursuant to this paragraph shall be known as a junior hunting license and a person who holds one of these licenses shall be known as a junior hunter.

(3) A nonresident, 16 years of age or older, upon the payment of a base fee of one hundred eight dollars and fifty cents ($108.50).

(4) A nonresident, 16 years of age or older, valid only for two consecutive days upon payment of the fee set forth in paragraph (1). A license issued pursuant to this paragraph is valid only for taking resident and migratory game birds, resident small game mammals, fur-bearing mammals, wild pigs, and nongame mammals, as defined in this code or in regulations adopted by the commission.

(5) A nonresident, valid for one day and only for the taking of domesticated game birds and pheasants while on the premises of a licensed game bird club, or for the taking of domesticated migratory game
 birds in areas licensed for shooting those birds, upon the payment of a base fee of fifteen dollars ($15).

(b) The base fees specified in this section are applicable to the 2004 license year, and shall be adjusted annually thereafter pursuant to Section 713.

(c) The commission shall adjust the amount of the fees specified in subdivision (b), as necessary, to fully recover, but not exceed, all reasonable administrative and implementation costs of the department and the commission relating to those licenses.

(d) A person who is 16 or 17 years of age, is in possession of a valid resident or nonresident hunting license, and is issued an entry permit pursuant to Section 551 of Title 14 of the California Code of Regulations may hunt in the area described in the entry permit unaccompanied by a person over 18 years of age
 but shall not be accompanied by a person under 16 years of age.

(e) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2020.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 469, Sec. 7.   (SB 856)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

3031.2.

(a) In addition to Section 3031, and notwithstanding Section 3037, the department shall issue lifetime hunting licenses under this section. A lifetime hunting license authorizes the taking of birds and mammals anywhere in this state in accordance with the law for purposes other than profit for the life of the person to whom issued unless revoked for a violation of this code or regulations adopted under this code. A lifetime hunting license is not transferable. A lifetime hunting license is valid for one year from July 1 through June 30 and may be renewed annually, regardless of any lapse of the license, at no additional cost to the licensee. A lifetime hunting license does not include any special tags, validations, stamps, or
 fees.

(b) A lifetime hunting license may be issued to residents of this state, as follows:

(1) To a person 62 years of age or over, upon payment of a base fee of three hundred sixty-five dollars ($365).

(2) To a person 40 years of age or over, and less than 62 years of age, upon payment of a base fee of five hundred forty dollars ($540).

(3) To a person 10 years of age or over, and less than 40 years of age, upon payment of a base fee of six hundred dollars ($600).

(4) To a person less than 10 years of age, upon payment of a base fee of three hundred sixty-five dollars ($365).

(c) (1) Upon payment of a base fee of four hundred forty-five dollars ($445), a person holding a lifetime hunting license shall annually be issued both of the following:

(A) One deer tag application pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 4332.

(B) One wild pig validation pursuant to Section 4654.

(2) Lifetime privileges issued pursuant to this subdivision are not transferable.

(d) Upon payment of a base fee of two hundred ten dollars ($210), a person holding a lifetime hunting license shall be entitled annually to the privileges afforded to a person holding a state duck stamp
 or validation issued pursuant to Section 3700.1 and an upland game bird stamp or validation issued pursuant to Section 3682.1. Lifetime privileges issued pursuant to this subdivision are not transferable.

(e) Nothing in this section requires a person less than 16 years of age to obtain a license to take birds or mammals except as required by law.

(f) Nothing in this section exempts an applicant for a license from meeting other qualifications or requirements otherwise established by law for the privilege of sport hunting.

(g) The base fees specified in this section are applicable commencing January 1, 2004, and shall be adjusted annually thereafter pursuant to Section 713.

(h) The commission shall adjust the amount of the fees specified in subdivisions (b), (c), and (d), as necessary, to fully recover, but not exceed, all reasonable administrative and implementation costs of the department and the commission relating to those licenses.

(i) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2024.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 8) and added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 469, Sec. 9.   (SB 856)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Operative July 1, 2024, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

3031.5.

For the purpose of obtaining a hunting license, enrollees in the Job Corps, created by the Economic Opportunity Act of 1964 (Public Law 88-452), shall be deemed to be residents of California.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1086.)
-------------------------------------------

3032.

(a) As used in this section:

(1) “Bear” and “pursue” have the same meanings as defined in Section 3960.

(2) “Hound” means a dog used to pursue mammals.

(b) The commission may establish a hound tag program.

(c) If a hound tag program is established, the commission may require all of the following:

(1) That each hound be issued a license tag bearing a unique identifying number that is to be worn at all times by the hound while pursuing mammals.

(2) That all relevant local and state laws pertaining to dogs are being followed while the hound is being used to pursue mammals.

(3) That each hound be microchipped with an implanted transponder that has a unique identification code.

(4) That the owner maintain documentation showing that the hound is current on all required vaccinations and treatments for the prevention of rabies and any other disease specified by the department.

(5) That the owner report, within 24 hours of its last sighting, any hound that is lost during hunting, pursuing, or tracking activities.

(6) That the hound’s tag identification number be recorded on the hunting tag of any animal taken using the services of the hound.

(d) If a hound tag program is established, the commission may adjust the amount of the fees for the hound tag as necessary, to fully recover, but not exceed, all reasonable administrative and implementation costs of the department and the commission relating to the program.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 595, Sec. 1.   (SB 1221)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

3033.
